Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions [Repealed]

7-83-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.48 (Williams, § 3708.50); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2701; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 1, §§7-83-101 —7-83-105, concerned general provisions of the power district law.

7-83-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.49 (Williams, § 3708.52); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2702; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 1, §§7-83-101 —7-83-105, concerned general provisions of the power district law.

7-83-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.53 (Williams, § 3708.56); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2724; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 1, §§7-83-101 —7-83-105, concerned general provisions of the power district law.

7-83-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1980, ch. 756, § 7; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 1, §§7-83-101 —7-83-105, concerned general provisions of the power district law.

7-83-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.63 (Williams, § 3708.66); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2725; T.C.A., §7-83-104; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 1, §§7-83-101 —7-83-105, concerned general provisions of the power district law.